Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 10.5
PUBLIC DEPOSIT PROTECTION

11-10.5-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Public Deposit Protection Act".

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 593, § 1, effective September 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-10.5-101 as it existed prior to 1989.

11-10.5-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the purpose of this article is to serve the taxpayers and the citizens of Colorado by establishing standards and procedures to ensure the preservation and protection of all public funds held on deposit by a bank that are either not insured by or are in excess of the insured limits of federal deposit insurance, and to ensure the expedited repayment of such funds in the event of default and subsequent liquidation of a bank which holds such deposits.

The general assembly further finds, determines, and declares that the protection of public funds on deposit in banks is a matter of statewide concern and importance and that as such:

The provisions of this article shall prevail over any local government ordinance or resolution and over any home rule or territorial charter provision in conflict therewith; and

The requirement that a national bank comply with the provisions of this article neither encroaches upon the prerogatives of a nationally chartered bank nor exceeds the authority of the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 593, § 1, effective September 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-10.5-102 as it existed prior to 1989.

11-10.5-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Aggregate uninsured public deposits" means the total amount of cash, checks, or drafts on deposit at the close of a business day for credit to the official custodian accounts in an eligible public depository, and which are either not insured by or are in excess of the insurable limits of federal deposit insurance.

"Bank" means any bank organized or chartered under this article and articles 101 to 109 of this title or any bank organized or chartered under chapter 2 of title 12 of the United States Code. For purposes of section 11-10.5-104 and 11-10.5-111 (1) only, the definition of "bank" also includes those banks chartered under the laws of other states.

"Banking board" means the banking board established by section 11-102-103.

"Defaulting depository" means any eligible public depository to which an event of default has occurred.

"Eligible collateral" means, with respect to the securing of uninsured public funds, those instruments or obligations approved to be used for such purposes by the banking board pursuant to the provisions of section 11-10.5-107.

"Eligible public depository" means any bank which has been designated as an eligible public depository by the banking board.

"Event of default" means the issuance of an order by a supervisory authority or a receiver which restrains an eligible public depository from paying its deposit liabilities.

"Federal deposit insurance" means deposit insurance or guarantees provided by the federal deposit insurance corporation or any successor agency thereto.

"Official custodian" means:

A designee with plenary authority, including control over public funds of a public unit which the official custodian is appointed to serve. For purposes of this paragraph (a), "control" includes possession of public funds, as well as the authority to establish accounts for such public funds in banks and to make deposits, withdrawals, or disbursements of such public funds. If the exercise of plenary authority over the public funds of a public unit requires action by or the consent of two or more putative official custodians, then such official custodians shall be treated as one official custodian with respect to such public funds.

A designee, other than a designee described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (9), with authority, including control, over public funds of an entity, including the state of Colorado; any institution, agency, instrumentality, authority, county, municipality, city and county, school district, special district, or other political subdivision of the state of Colorado, including any institution of higher education; any institution, department, agency, instrumentality, or authority of any of the foregoing, including any county or municipal housing authority; any local government investment pool organized pursuant to part 7 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.; any public entity insurance pool organized pursuant to state statute; any public body corporate created or established under the constitution of the state of Colorado or any state statute; and any other entity, organization, or corporation formed by intergovernmental agreement or other contract between or among any of the foregoing. For purposes of this paragraph (b), "control" includes possession of public funds, as well as the authority to establish accounts for such public funds in banks and to make deposits, withdrawals, or disbursements of such public funds. If the exercise of authority over such public funds requires action by or the consent of two or more putative official custodians, then such official custodians shall be treated as one official custodian with respect to such public funds.

"Political subdivision" includes any subdivision or any principal department of a public unit:

The creation of which subdivision or principal department has been expressly authorized by state statute;

To which some functions of government have been delegated by state statute; and

To which funds have been allocated by ordinance or state statute for its exclusive use and control.

"Political subdivision" also includes drainage, irrigation, navigation, improvement, levee, sanitary, school, and power districts and bridge and port authorities and any other special district created by state statute or compact between the state of Colorado and one or more states.

"Political subdivision" does not include subordinate or nonautonomous divisions, agencies, or boards within principal departments of a public unit.

"Public deposits" means all public funds on deposit in an eligible public depository in any form, whether time, savings, or demand.

"Public funds" means all funds of a public unit and all funds of any entity referred to in paragraph (b) of subsection (9) of this section.

"Public unit" means the state of Colorado, any county, city and county, city, or municipality, including any home rule city or town or territorial charter city, or any political subdivision thereof.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 594, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 650, § 8, effective May 1.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 1206, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 324, § 9, effective April 7; (2) amended, p. 1190, § 17, effective August 4.

11-10.5-104. Applicability of article.

The provisions of this article shall apply to all banks which elect to become eligible public depositories. No bank shall hold any public funds unless such bank has been designated as an eligible public depository pursuant to the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 595, § 1, effective September 1.

11-10.5-105. Authority of banking board.

The banking board shall have the authority to implement any provision of this article by order and by rule and regulation and may obtain restraining orders and injunctions to prevent violation of or to enforce compliance with the provisions of this article and the orders and rules and regulations issued under such provisions. The authority of the banking board shall be liberally construed to ensure that the purposes of this article are properly implemented.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 595, § 1, effective September 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-10.5-104 as it existed prior to 1989.

11-10.5-106. Designation as eligible public depository - acceptance of provisions.

No bank shall be a public depository or shall hold public funds without first being designated as an eligible public depository by the banking board pursuant to the provisions of this section.

No bank shall be designated an eligible public depository unless the bank meets the following criteria:

The deposits of such bank are insured or guaranteed by federal deposit insurance;

The bank is in compliance with the capital standards established by the banking board; and

The bank agrees in writing to abide by all regulatory directives, reporting requirements, examination requirements, and other criteria established for the administration and enforcement of the provisions and purposes of this article.

Any bank which meets the criteria established in subsection (2) of this section and which desires to accept and hold public funds on and after September 1, 1989, shall file a written application with the banking board requesting designation as an eligible public depository. The request shall be signed by an executive officer of the bank and shall state that the bank agrees to abide by the provisions of this article and all rules and regulations promulgated by the banking board for the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this article.
(3) (a) (I) Any bank which meets the criteria established in subsection (2) of this section and which desires to accept and hold public funds on and after September 1, 1989, shall file a written application with the banking board requesting designation as an eligible public depository. The request shall be signed by an executive officer of the bank and shall state that the bank agrees to abide by the provisions of this article and all rules and regulations promulgated by the banking board for the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this article.

If the bank requesting such designation was an eligible public depository under applicable law in effect prior to September 1, 1989, and desires to continue to be an eligible public depository subject to the provisions of this article, it shall file the required written application within thirty days following August 1, 1989. If the banking board has no reason to believe that the bank would fail to meet the criteria or fail to follow the provisions of this article, it may designate such bank as an eligible public depository and issue an appropriate certificate evidencing such designation. Such immediate designation is provided for the convenience of the banking board in order to expedite transition from laws governing the protection of public funds in effect prior to September 1, 1989, and is not to be construed as granting a right or privilege to any bank to be designated as an eligible public depository.

Any bank which was not an eligible public depository under applicable law in effect prior to September 1, 1989, or any bank which was granted a charter on or after said date, or any bank which has had its certificate as an eligible public depository withdrawn or revoked by either the banking board or the commissioner may at any time make written application to the banking board for designation as an eligible public depository. Such application shall be made on such forms or in such format as may be prescribed by the banking board. Upon submittal, the application shall contain all required information and shall be accompanied by a fee to be determined by the banking board. The banking board shall review the application and, not more than sixty days from the date that the application was submitted, shall either grant and issue or deny issuance of a certificate evidencing such designation. The banking board may extend the sixty-day review period for not more than thirty additional days.

Designation as an eligible public depository shall not constitute either a right or a license, and such designation may be revoked, suspended, or placed under restrictions, limitations, or other conditions by the banking board if the board determines that the eligible public depository has failed to comply with the provisions of this article or any rule and regulation promulgated by the banking board for the administration or enforcement of this article or with the provisions of any order of the banking board.

Once granted, designation as an eligible public depository may be retained by the bank to which it was granted unless the banking board acts to suspend, revoke, or otherwise limit the designation. Designation is unique to the bank to which it was granted and may not be sold or transferred to another bank. In the event that a bank designated as an eligible public depository is acquired or merged with another entity, the banking board shall review the continuation of such designation under either this paragraph (b) or paragraph (a) of this subsection (3).

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 595, § 1, effective September 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-10.5-105 as it existed prior to 1989.

11-10.5-107. Eligible collateral - uninsured public deposits.

The banking board shall establish by rule and regulation a list of approved instruments and obligations to be used as eligible collateral by an eligible public depository in order to comply with the provisions of this section. As part of its findings, the banking board shall determine that each approved obligation or instrument meets at least the following criteria:

The obligation or instrument is characterized by attributes of safety, liquidity, and soundness meeting the purposes of this article for the preservation and protection of public funds;

The obligation or instrument, with respect to its market value, shall be marketable or convertible into cash within such time periods as shall be prescribed by the banking board to assure that any claim made pursuant to section 11-10.5-110 is fully and promptly paid;

The standards and relevant factors required to establish and evaluate the current market value of the obligation or instrument are prescribed by the banking board at the time the obligation or instrument is approved for use as eligible collateral, which standards and relevant factors may include statistical standards for deviations from the original market value assigned at the time of approval for use that would result in an automatic deletion from the list of approved eligible collateral;

The market value of each obligation or instrument is verified at least monthly, unless the banking board prescribes a different period for a particular obligation or instrument;

The banking board has at its disposal adequate resources to monitor and evaluate the market value of the obligation or instrument; and

The obligation or instrument satisfies such other criteria as the banking board may establish.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the banking board shall not treat any eligible public depository differently than any other eligible public depository.

In promulgating the list of eligible collateral pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the banking board, within the bounds of safety and soundness, shall not establish market values or other evaluation criteria which are disproportionately more restrictive for banks than comparable market values or evaluation criteria for any other class of eligible public depositories operating under this article or any other state law. It is the intent of the general assembly that, to the extent practicable, competitive parity among eligible public depositories which existed under applicable law in effect prior to September 1, 1989, should be maintained.

The banking board shall establish procedures to notify each eligible public depository in a timely manner of the obligations and instruments that have been approved for use as eligible collateral and of obligations and instruments that have been deleted from the list of approved eligible collateral. Any eligible public depository utilizing as collateral an obligation or instrument which has been deleted from the list of approved eligible collateral shall, within three business days of receiving notice of the deletion or within such longer period as prescribed by the banking board, remove it from its portfolio of collateral and substitute sufficient other obligations or instruments that are approved for use as eligible collateral to properly secure public funds as required by this article.

The banking board shall by rule establish criteria and procedures for reducing or removing any uninsured public funds deposited in an eligible public depository if said depository fails to comply with the capital or safety and soundness standards established by the banking board.

The banking board shall require an eligible public depository to increase, substitute, add to, or modify the amount or type of eligible collateral held to secure any uninsured public funds so that the collateral is adequate to fully protect the public funds if the capital or financial condition of the eligible public depository fails to comply with the capital or safety and soundness standards established by the banking board. The banking board shall establish such procedures as may be necessary to ensure that all collateral held pursuant to an action taken under this paragraph (b) is characterized by the highest degree of marketability and liquidity so that, in the event of default, all public deposits may be promptly and fully repaid.

As an ongoing requirement of designation as an eligible public depository, any such depository shall pledge collateral having a market value in excess of one hundred two percent of the aggregate uninsured public deposits.

An eligible public depository shall remove any obligation or instrument pledged as eligible collateral if the banking board determines that the obligation or instrument has failed in some manner to meet the criteria required by this section and shall substitute another obligation or instrument of eligible collateral that is satisfactory to the banking board.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 597, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2009:

(4) amended, (HB 09-1053), ch. 159, p. 687, § 2, effective August 5.

11-10.5-108. Collateral - where held - right of substitution - income derived.

Eligible collateral shall be held as provided in this article or by rules and regulations of the banking board. Eligible collateral shall be held in the custody of any bank, including a federal reserve bank, or any depository trust company which has been approved by the banking board to hold eligible collateral and is supervised by the banking board, or an equivalent governmental agency responsible for the regulation of banks in the state in which such bank or depository trust company is located.

An eligible public depository which has its own trust department may make application to the banking board to be allowed to segregate its required eligible collateral from the other assets of the eligible public depository and to hold such collateral in its own trust department under such conditions as the banking board shall prescribe by rule and regulation. The banking board may require an eligible public depository that is holding its own eligible collateral in its own trust department to cease doing so and to have the eligible collateral held by some other entity authorized to hold collateral by paragraph (a) of this subsection (1). Any eligible public depository which holds collateral for any other eligible public depository and which is granted permission by the banking board to hold its own collateral as well shall at all times keep the collateral held for each such eligible public depository segregated.

Under circumstances where eligible collateral is maintained as required by this article, and where such eligible collateral is not held by the eligible public depository's own trust department, each eligible public depository shall provide in a written deposit or pledge agreement between the said eligible public depository and the custodian of the collateral, or in such other manner as shall be prescribed by the banking board by rule and regulation, that:

In the event of default or insolvency of the eligible public depository for which the collateral is held, the custodian shall surrender such collateral to the banking board; and

The custodian shall make available to the banking board the eligible collateral and any books, records, and papers pertaining thereto for any examination or other reason necessary for the administration of this article.

An eligible public depository may at any time make substitutions of eligible collateral maintained or pledged for the purposes of this article pursuant to collateral substitution procedures established by the banking board and shall at all times be entitled to collect and retain all income derived from such collateral without restriction. The privilege granted under this subsection (3) may be suspended or revoked by the banking board if the eligible public depository has become the subject of increased regulatory oversight as a result of its failure to maintain capital standards required by the banking board for the holding of public funds.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 598, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 91:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 650, § 9, effective May 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-10.5-109 as it existed prior to 1989.

11-10.5-109. Verification of collateral held - reports required.

Each eligible public depository shall submit reports at least monthly to the banking board in such format as the banking board may prescribe. Such report shall demonstrate that the eligible public depository is in full compliance with the provisions of this article. In addition, each eligible public depository shall submit copies of its quarterly call reports to the banking board thirty days after the close of each fiscal quarter.

The board of directors of an eligible public depository shall cause an annual audit to be completed at least annually, but at intervals of not more than fifteen months, by an independent accounting firm composed of certified public accountants or a director's examination by a public accountant or any other independent person or persons as determined by the banking board. The banking board shall adopt regulations regarding the qualifications of such public accountant and other independent person or persons who shall assume the responsibility for due care in such directors' examinations. The banking board's regulations shall also establish the scope of such directors' examinations which shall include safeguards to insure that such examinations adequately describe the financial condition of the financial institution. Such independent audit or directors' examination shall be completed and submitted to the banking board within the time lines the banking board requires. Such audits or directors' examinations shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following information:

The official custodian on whose behalf any public funds are held;

The name and address of each such official custodian;

The amount of public funds on deposit for each such custodian;

The amount of federal deposit insurance coverage for each such official custodian;

The eligible collateral pledged for aggregate uninsured public deposits and the market value of such eligible collateral; and

Any other information which may be required by the banking board by rule and regulation.

The banking board may examine all public deposits held by and all eligible collateral required to be maintained by an eligible public depository, and all books, records, and papers pertaining thereto.

Each eligible public depository shall be assessed reasonable expenses by the banking board to meet the costs of any examinations made in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 599, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 90:

IP(2) amended, p. 667, § 35, effective June 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 11-10.5-109.5 and 11-50-111 as they existed prior to 1989.

11-10.5-110. Procedures when event of default occurs.

When the banking board has determined that an eligible public depository has experienced an event of default, the banking board shall proceed in the following manner:

The board shall seize and take possession of all eligible collateral belonging to or held on behalf of the defaulting depository from wherever such eligible collateral is held.

The board shall ascertain the aggregate amounts of public funds held by the defaulting depository as disclosed by the records of such depository. The board shall determine for each official custodian for whom public funds are held by the defaulting depository the accounts and the amount of federal deposit insurance that is available for each account. It shall then determine for each such official custodian the amount of uninsured public funds and the eligible collateral that is pledged to secure such funds. Upon completion of this analysis, the board shall provide each such official custodian with a statement that reports the amount of public funds held by the defaulting depository in his behalf, the amount that may be protected by federal deposit insurance, and the amount that is safeguarded by eligible collateral as required by this article. Each such official custodian shall verify this information from his records within ten working days after receiving the report and information from the banking board.

Upon receipt of a verified report from such official custodian and if the defaulting eligible public depository is to be liquidated or otherwise removed from status as an eligible public depository, the banking board shall proceed to liquidate all eligible collateral held for the safeguarding of public deposits and shall repay each official custodian for the uninsured public deposits held by the depository in his behalf.

In the event that a federal deposit insurance agency is appointed and acts as liquidator or receiver of any eligible public depository under state or federal law, those duties under this article that are specified to be performed by the banking board in the event of default may be delegated to and performed by the said federal deposit insurance agency. Any liquidation occurring under the provisions of this section shall conform to the procedures established in section 11-103-804.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 600, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 1206, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-10.5-113 as it existed prior to 1989.

11-10.5-111. Public funds to be deposited only in eligible public depositories - responsibilities of official custodians and eligible public depositories - penalty.

Any official custodian may deposit public funds in any bank which has been designated by the banking board as an eligible public depository. It is unlawful for an official custodian to deposit public funds in any bank other than one that has been so designated.

Each official custodian shall inform an eligible public depository that the public funds on deposit are subject to the provisions of this article before entering into a depository agreement with the eligible public depository. It is the responsibility of the official custodian to maintain documents or other verification necessary to properly identify the public funds which are subject to the provisions of this article.

The division, in consultation with the state treasurer and the state controller, shall establish the necessary controls to ensure the proper identification of public depository accounts.

An official custodian who acted in good faith in selecting, designating, or approving any eligible public depository for the deposit of public funds shall not be liable for any loss of public funds deposited in an eligible public depository if such loss is caused by the occurrence of an event of default of such eligible public depository.

Any official custodian who violates the provisions of this article 10.5 commits a civil infraction. Upon any such conviction, the court may adjudge that the official custodian be removed from public office.

Any director, bank officer, or manager who knowingly violates the provisions of this article 10.5 commits a civil infraction.

It is unlawful for any director, bank officer, or manager of any bank to accept or receive any public funds while such bank is insolvent or while under verbal or written order from the banking board not to accept or receive any public funds.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, nothing shall be construed to prevent a bank which is an eligible public depository operating pursuant to the provisions of this article from being or acting as an agent on behalf of any official custodian for the purposes of making investments as authorized by part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. Any such bank shall maintain such accounting records as are necessary to readily distinguish between the activities authorized by said part 6 and the purposes of the public deposit protection requirements imposed upon it as a condition of being an eligible public depository. The banking board may promulgate such rules and regulations as it deems necessary to ensure that the activities authorized under part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., and the protection of public funds pursuant to this article are not commingled.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 601, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2001:

(3) amended, p. 155, § 1, effective March 28.

L. 2021:

(4)(b) and (4)(c) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3149, § 119, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 11-10.5-118, 11-10.5-119, and 11-10.5-121 as they existed prior to 1989.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a civil infraction, see § 18-1.3-503.

11-10.5-112. Annual fees and assessments.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the public deposit administration fund. The fund shall consist of moneys required to be credited to the fund pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and all interest earned on the investment of the moneys in the fund. Any such interest shall be credited at least annually to said fund. Moneys in the fund shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly to the banking board to be used solely for the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this article. No moneys shall be appropriated from the general fund for payment of any expenses incurred under this section, and no such expenses shall be charged against the state.

Every eligible public depository shall be assessed an annual fee in an amount established by the banking board for the costs of enforcement and administration of this article. Such fees shall fairly and equitably apply to all eligible public depositories calculated according to the proportion of aggregate public funds that each depository holds in relation to the total of all aggregate public deposits held by all eligible public depositories for each annual period for which they were eligible public depositories. The banking board shall transmit such fees to the state treasurer who shall credit the same to the public deposit administration fund.

All fees assessed against an eligible public depository in accordance with the provisions of section 11-10.5-109 (4) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer who shall credit the same to the public deposit administration fund.

In setting fees, the banking board shall apply the standards imposed on boards and commissions of the division of professions and occupations in the department of regulatory agencies for determining the amount of fees pursuant to the provisions of section 12-20-105.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 602, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 90:

(2) amended, p. 667, § 36, effective June 7.

L. 2019:

(4) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1658, § 56, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-10.5-120 as it existed prior to 1989.